Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.110

Number of arbitrators—Immunity.

(1) The parties are free to determine the number of arbitrators.

(2) Failing such determination, the number of arbitrators shall be three.

(3) An arbitrator has the immunity of a judicial officer from civil liability when acting in the capacity of arbitrator under any statute or contract. The immunity afforded by this section shall supplement, and not supplant, any otherwise applicable common law or statutory immunity.

[ 2015 c 276 s 11.]